Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2006
Acupuncture, defined.

Acupuncture means the insertion, manipulation, and removal of acupuncture needles and the application of manual, mechanical, thermal, electrical, and electromagnetic treatment to such needles at specific points or meridians on the human body in an effort to promote, maintain, and restore health and for the treatment of disease, based on acupuncture theory. Acupuncture may include the recommendation of therapeutic exercises, dietary guidelines, and nutritional support to promote the effectiveness of the acupuncture treatment. Acupuncture does not include manipulation or mobilization of or adjustment to the spine, extraspinal manipulation, or the practice of medical nutrition therapy.

Laws 2001, LB 270, § 8;

Laws 2003, LB 242, § 80;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,344;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 664.